Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 8 TLSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh S.F. 442 DIVISION I 1 TEACHER SALARY SUPPLEMENT DISTRICT COST PER PUPIL 2 Section 1. Section 257.10, subsection 9, paragraph a, 3 subparagraph (3), subparagraph divisions (b) and (c), Code 4 2025, are amended to read as follows: 5 (b) The department of management shall categorize all 6 school districts into not more than ten tiers according to each 7 school districtâs actual enrollment. Each tier established 8 by the department of management containing a school district 9 with an actual enrollment above three thousand five hundred 10 pupils shall contain, to the extent feasible, the same number 11 of school districts as other tiers containing school districts 12 with an actual enrollment of more than three thousand five 13 hundred pupils. Each tier established by the department 14 of management containing a school district with an actual 15 enrollment equal to or less than three thousand five hundred 16 pupils shall contain, to the extent feasible, the same number 17 of school districts as other tiers containing school districts 18 with an actual enrollment equal to or less than three thousand 19 five hundred pupils. 20 (c) (b) (i) To support school districts with meeting 21 the minimum teacher salary requirements under chapter 284, 22 including the minimum teacher starting salary requirement 23 of fifty thousand dollars ; and the minimum teacher salary 24 requirement for full-time teachers with, as of July 1, 2025, at 25 least twelve years of experience of sixty-two thousand dollars 26 under chapter 284 ; and the minimum teacher salary requirement 27 for teachers with at least twelve years of experience, who 28 have had a bona fide retirement from employment with a covered 29 employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who have returned 30 to covered full-time employment with a covered employer 31 pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 32 256, of fifty thousand dollars, and other costs associated 33 with such salary requirements, as identified in subparagraph 34 subdivision (ii) including costs associated with the employerâs 35 -1- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 1/ 13 S.F. 442 share of contributions to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement 1 system and the employerâs share of the tax imposed by the 2 federal Insurance Contributions Act , the department of 3 management shall calculate and assign to all school districts 4 in a tier established under subparagraph division (b), a 5 teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil in an amount 6 based in part on the average cost to school districts within 7 the tier to meet the requirements , plus an amount equal to the 8 teacher salary supplement supplemental state aid amount for the 9 budget year . 10 (ii) If, however, a school districtâs total teacher 11 salary supplement district cost under paragraph âcâ , as 12 calculated using the teacher salary supplement district cost 13 per pupil assigned to the school districtâs applicable tier, 14 is insufficient to comply with the applicable minimum teacher 15 salary requirements of the school district, including costs 16 associated with the employerâs share of contributions to the 17 Iowa public employeesâ retirement system and the employerâs 18 share of the tax imposed by the federal Insurance Contributions 19 Act , the department of management shall set the school 20 districtâs teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil 21 at an amount necessary to meet the districtâs minimum salary 22 requirements and associated costs. If, however, a school 23 district reported a teacherâs years of experience incorrectly 24 on the fall 2023 basic educational data survey compared to the 25 fall 2024 basic educational data survey, and the difference 26 would have resulted in an additional per pupil amount for 27 the budget year beginning July 1, 2024, the department of 28 management shall increase the teacher salary supplement 29 district cost per pupil for the budget year beginning July 1, 30 2025, by the difference between the teacher salary supplement 31 district cost per pupil that would have been calculated if not 32 for the incorrect reporting and the teacher salary supplement 33 district cost per pupil actually calculated. 34 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 35 -2- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 2/ 13 S.F. 442 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 1 DIVISION II 2 TEACHER PREPARATION 3 Sec. 3. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, 4 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 5 (1) (a) Require Except as described in subparagraph 6 division (b), require that each student admitted to an approved 7 practitioner preparation program participate in pre-student 8 teaching field experiences that include both observation and 9 participation in teaching activities in a variety of school 10 settings. 11 (a) Pre-student teaching field experiences for students 12 participating in an initial teacher preparation program shall 13 comprise a total of at least eighty hours in duration, at least 14 ten hours of which shall occur prior to a studentâs acceptance 15 in an approved practitioner preparation program. 16 (b) Pre-student teaching field experiences for students 17 participating in a teacher intern preparation program shall may 18 comprise a total of at least fifty hours in duration. 19 Sec. 4. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, 20 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), subparagraph 21 subdivision (i), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 22 (i) The If the student has prior work experience as a 23 substitute teacher, the board of educational examiners has 24 issued a substitute license , or substitute authorization , or a 25 para-educator certificate to the student. 26 Sec. 5. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, 27 subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), subparagraph 28 subdivision (i), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 29 subparagraph subdivision. 30 Sec. 6. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph m, 31 subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended by striking the 32 subparagraph. 33 DIVISION III 34 OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT 35 -3- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 3/ 13 S.F. 442 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 282.35 Children requiring special 1 education ââ out-of-state placement. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âChildâ means an individual who is under the age of 4 eighteen years, or an individual who is under the age of 5 twenty-one and is a full-time student, to whom all of the 6 following criteria apply: 7 (1) The individual is eligible for health care benefits 8 under chapter 249A. 9 (2) The individualâs health care coordination and 10 intervention team determines, pursuant to section 249A.4A, 11 subsection 3, paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (1), that the 12 placement of the individual in an out-of-state facility, or 13 placement of the individual with an out-of-state provider, is 14 necessary for the individual to realize the full benefits of 15 chapter 249A. 16 (3) The director of the department of health and human 17 services certifies that the placement of the individual in an 18 out-of-state facility, or placement of the individual with an 19 out-of-state provider, is necessary to prevent the filing of a 20 petition under chapter 232 related to the individual. 21 (4) The director of the department of education determines 22 that the placement of the individual in an out-of-state 23 facility, or placement of the individual with an out-of-state 24 provider, would provide to the individual the education 25 required under chapter 256B and the rules adopted pursuant to 26 chapter 256B. 27 (5) The individual is and remains a resident of this state. 28 b. âDistrict of residenceâ means the school district in 29 which the parent or legal guardian of the child resides or the 30 district in which the district court is located if the district 31 court is the guardian of the child. 32 c. âResidentâ means the same as defined in section 282.1, 33 subsection 2. 34 2. A childâs district of residence may place the child in 35 -4- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 4/ 13 S.F. 442 an out-of-state facility or with an out-of-state provider for 1 purposes of providing the child with the education required 2 under chapter 256B, subject to the terms of an agreement 3 between the childâs district of residence and the facility or 4 provider. The agreement shall satisfy all of the following 5 requirements: 6 a. The agreement must require the facility or provider to 7 provide periodic invoices to the childâs district of residence 8 that describes the services provided to the child and the cost 9 associated with such services. 10 b. The agreement must condition the childâs district of 11 residenceâs payment of the invoice described in paragraph 12 âaâ upon the facility or provider providing to the child the 13 education required under chapter 256B and the rules adopted 14 pursuant to chapter 256B. 15 3. a. A childâs district of residence is not financially 16 responsible for the services provided by an out-of-state 17 facility or an out-of-state provider to a child unless the 18 out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provides notice 19 to the childâs district of residence that the child may be 20 subject to this section and the childâs district of residence 21 enters into an agreement with the out-of-state facility 22 or out-of-state provider that satisfies the requirements 23 established in subsection 2. 24 b. By August 1 following the school year in which the 25 out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provided 26 services to a child pursuant to an agreement entered into under 27 subsection 2, the childâs district of residence may submit 28 an accounting to the department of education that describes 29 the cost of the services provided by the facility or provider 30 during such school year. 31 c. By August 15 following the school year in which the 32 out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provided 33 services to a child pursuant to an agreement entered into 34 under subsection 2, the department of education shall review 35 -5- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 5/ 13 S.F. 442 and either approve or modify the accounting submitted pursuant 1 to paragraph âbâ and make payment to the childâs district of 2 residence toward the school year in which the cost of the 3 services was incurred. The payment amount is the difference 4 between the amount of the actual costs as reflected in the 5 district of residenceâs accounting less the amount generated by 6 the weighting for the provision of services. 7 d. Any amounts paid by the department of education to school 8 districts in this state pursuant to paragraph âcâ shall be 9 deducted on a monthly basis from the state foundation aid paid 10 under section 257.16 to all school districts in the state in 11 the school year following the school year in which the services 12 were provided. The portion of the total amount paid by the 13 department of education to a district that shall be deducted 14 from the state foundation aid paid to the district shall be the 15 same as the ratio that the budget enrollment for the budget 16 year of the district bears to the total budget enrollment in 17 the state for that budget year. 18 4. The department of education shall promptly and summarily 19 resolve any disputes between school districts related to the 20 financial responsibility of such school districts under this 21 section. 22 DIVISION IV 23 ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM 24 Sec. 8. Section 84A.6, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended 25 by striking the subsection. 26 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 256.27 Online state job posting 27 system. 28 1. The department shall provide for the operation of an 29 online state job posting system. The system shall be designed 30 and implemented for the online posting of job openings offered 31 by school districts, charter schools, area education agencies, 32 the department, and accredited nonpublic schools. The system 33 shall be accessible via the departmentâs internet site. The 34 system shall include a mechanism for the electronic submission 35 -6- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 6/ 13 S.F. 442 of job openings for posting on the system as provided in 1 subsection 2. The system and each job posting on the system 2 shall include a statement that an employer submitting a job 3 opening for posting on the system will not discriminate in 4 hiring on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, 5 gender, age, physical disability, sexual orientation, gender 6 identity, religion, marital status, or status as a veteran. 7 The department may contract for, or partner with another entity 8 for, the use of an existing internet site to operate the online 9 state job posting system if the existing internet site is more 10 effective and economical than the departmentâs internet site. 11 2. A school district, charter school, or area education 12 agency shall submit all of its job openings to the department 13 for posting on the system and shall keep and maintain all 14 unfilled job openings on the system. The department shall post 15 all of its job openings on the system. An accredited nonpublic 16 school may submit job openings to the department for posting 17 on the system. 18 3. This section shall not be construed to do any of the 19 following: 20 a. Prohibit any employer from advertising job openings and 21 recruiting employees independently of the system. 22 b. Prohibit any employer from using another method of 23 advertising job openings or another applicant tracking system 24 in addition to the system. 25 c. Provide the department with any regulatory authority in 26 the hiring process or hiring decisions of any employer other 27 than the department. 28 DIVISION V 29 TEACHER COMPENSATION 30 Sec. 10. Section 284.15, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 31 2025, is amended to read as follows: 32 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each 33 subsequent fiscal year, the salary for a career teacher, model 34 teacher, mentor teacher, or lead teacher, who holds a valid 35 -7- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 7/ 13 S.F. 442 license issued under chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 3 , and 1 who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, shall be at 2 least sixty-two thousand dollars. 3 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a 5 career teacher, model teacher, mentor teacher, or lead teacher, 6 who holds a valid license issued under chapter 256, subchapter 7 VII, part 3, who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, 8 who has had a bona fide retirement from employment with a 9 covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who 10 has returned to covered full-time employment with a covered 11 employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under 12 chapter 256, shall be paid not less than fifty thousand 13 dollars. 14 Sec. 11. Section 284.16, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 15 2025, is amended to read as follows: 16 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 17 each subsequent fiscal year, a career teacher, instructional 18 coach, curriculum and professional development leader, or model 19 teacher, who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, 20 shall be paid not less than sixty-two thousand dollars. 21 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal 22 year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal 23 year, a career teacher, instructional coach, curriculum and 24 professional development leader, or model teacher, who has been 25 a teacher for at least twelve years, who has had a bona fide 26 retirement from employment with a covered employer as provided 27 in section 97B.52A, and who has returned to covered full-time 28 employment with a covered employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a 29 teacher licensed under chapter 256, shall be paid not less than 30 fifty thousand dollars. 31 Sec. 12. Section 284.17, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 32 2025, is amended to read as follows: 33 b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each 34 subsequent fiscal year, the minimum salary of fifty thousand 35 -8- LSB 1126SV (2) 91 jda/jh 8/ 13 S.F. 442 dollars for a full-time teacher who has less than twelve years 1 of teaching experience and a minimum salary of sixty-two 2 thousand dollars for a full-time teacher who has at least 3 twelve years of teaching experience. 4 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal year 5 beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a 6 minimum salary of fifty thousand dollars for a full-time 7 teacher who has at least twelve years of teaching experience, 8 who has had a bona fide retirement from employment with a 9 covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who 10 has returned to covered full-time employment with a covered 11 employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under 12 chapter 256. 13